src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-maria_gt-norm.yaml
    # V_KUVITELLA
    ommella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ombelen
    ommella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ombelet
    ommella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ombelou
    ommella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ombelemmo
    ommella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ombeletto
    ommella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ombele
    ommella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ombelin
    ommella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ombelit
    ommella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ombeli
    ommella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ombelimmo
    ommella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ombelitto
    ommella+V+Der+Der/mA+V+Inf+Ill: ombelemah
    ommella+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: ommeltu
    ommella+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: ommellut

    # V_EZITELLAE
    liitellä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liittelöy
    liitellä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: liittelemmö
    liitellä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: liitelläh
    liitellä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: liitelläh
    liitellä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: liitelty
    liitellä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: liitellyt

    # V_ULISTA
    muhista+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: muhistu
    muhista+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: muhistut

    # V_PAISTA
    paista+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: paissuh
    paista+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: paissuot
    paista+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: paistu
    paista+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: paistut
    paista+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: paistavu
    paista+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: paistavat
